District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.36a

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subpart, the term:

(1)

“Development costs” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 2-1217.01(13).

(2)

“Development Sponsor” means Edens, or an affiliate thereof approved by the Mayor.

(3)

“Eligible project” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 2-1217.01(18).

(4)

“Home Rule Act” means Chapter 2 of Title 1 [§  1-201.01 et seq.].

(5)

“Project” means the financing, refinancing, or reimbursing of certain tax increment qualified costs incurred for the development of projects, including retail, residential, and office space on parcels, lots, and squares, within and abutting the boundary of the Florida Avenue Market as set forth in the Florida Avenue Market Small Area Plan, dated 2009, approved by the Florida Avenue Market Small Area Plan Approval Resolution of 2009, effective October 6, 2009 (Res. 18-257; 56 DCR 8401).

(6)

“Tax increment” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 1-204.90(n)(6).

(7)

“TIF Act” means part A of this chapter [§  2-1217.01 et seq.].

(8)

“TIF Bonds” means bonds, notes, or other obligations issued pursuant to the TIF Act.

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7192, 62 DCR 10905

History

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7162 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation